zh-TW: 蛙鞋浮力: 負浮力; 中性浮力; 正浮力; 其他
zh-CN: 鳍片浮力: 负浮力; 中性浮力; 正浮力; 其他
pt-BR: Flutuabilidade das barbatanas: Negativa; Neutra; Positiva; Outra
hu: Uszonyok felhajtóereje: Negatív; Semleges; Pozitív; Egyéb
pl: Wyporność płetw: Ujemna; Neutralna; Dodatnia; Inna
it: galleggiabilità delle pinne: Negativa; Neutra; Positiva; Altra
nl: Vin drijfvermogen: Negatief; Neutraal; Positief; Overig
ko: 핀 부력: 음성; 중성; 양성; 기타
el: Πλευστότητα πτερυγίων: Αρνητική; Ουδέτερη; Θετική; Άλλο
en: Fin buoyancy: Negative; Neutral; Positive; Other
sk-SK: Vztlak plutiev: Negatívny; Neutrálny; Pozitívny; Iné
es: Flotabilidad de la aleta: Negativa; Neutra; Positiva; Otra
bg-BG: Плаваемост на перките: Отрицателна; Неутрална; Положителна; Други
ro-RO: Flotabilitatea aripioarelor: Negativă; Neutră; Pozitivă; Altele
fi: Räpylän kelluvuus: Negatiivinen; Neutraali; Positiivinen; Muu
cs: Vztlak ploutví: Negativní; Neutrální; Pozitivní; Jiné
pt-PT: Flutuabilidade das barbatanas: Negativa; Neutra; Positiva; Outro
tr: Fin kaldırma kuvveti: Negatif; Nötr; Pozitif; Diğer
da: Svømmefodsopdrift: Negativ; Neutral; Positiv; Andet
nb: Finneoppdrift: Negativ; Nøytral; Positiv; Annet
fr: Flottabilité de l’aileron: Négative; Neutre; Positive; Autre
th: แรงลอยตัวของครีบ: จม; ลอยตัวเป็นกลาง; ลอยตัวเป็นบวก; อื่นๆ
ru: Плавучесть плавника: Отрицательная; Нейтральная; Положительная; Другое
sl-SI: Plovnost plavuti: Negativna; Nevtralna; Pozitivna; Drugo
sv: Flytkraft för fenor: Negativ; Neutral; Positiv; Övrigt
hr-HR: Plovnost peraja: Negativna; Neutralno; Pozitivno; Ostalo
de: Auftrieb der Flosse: Negativ; Neutral; Positiv; Sonstige
vi: Độ nổi của vây: Âm (chìm); Trung tính; Dương (nổi); Khác
ja: フィン浮力: マイナス浮力; 中性浮力; プラス浮力; その他
lt-LT: Peleko plūdrumas: Neigiamas; Neutralus; Teigiamas; Kita